District of Columbia statutes.
4-205.23

Obligations of custodial relatives other than parents.

(a)

When a relative applies for TANF in behalf of a child who is living in such relative’s home and the child’s parents are maintaining a home elsewhere, the Mayor shall determine whether the child is in fact deprived of parental care and support.

(b)

When parents are unwilling to accept the responsibility for the support of their children, a relative with whom a child is living shall be encouraged to cooperate with appropriate law enforcement officials charged with the responsibility for pursuing public remedies against the parents who are not contributing toward the support of their family; provided, that the failure of such relative to so cooperate with law enforcement officials shall have no effect on eligibility for assistance under this program.

Apr. 6, 1982, D.C. Law 4-101, § 523, 29 DCR 1060
Apr. 20, 1999, D.C. Law 12-241, § 2(z), 46 DCR 905
1981 Ed., § 3-205.23.
D.C. Law 12-241 substituted “TANF” for “AFDC” in (a).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Law 12-7, August 1, 1997, law notification 44 DCR 4639).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(x) of Public Assistance Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-130, July 24, 1998, law notification 45 DCR 6501).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(z) of Self-Sufficiency Promotion Temporary Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Law 12-230, April 20, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 4143).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-25, February 27, 1997, 44 DCR 1778), and § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1997 (D.C. Act 12-77, May 27, 1997, 44 DCR 3181).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(x) of the Public Assistance Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-306, March 20, 1998, 45 DCR 1900).
For temporary amendment of section, see § 2(z) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-372, June 9, 1998, 45 DCR 4270), § 2(z) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Legislative Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-425, July 31, 1998, 45 DCR 5682),§ 2(z) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1998 (D.C. Act 12-552, December 24, 1998, 46 DCR 521), and § 2(z) of the Self-Sufficiency Promotion Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-19, February 17, 1999, 46 DCR 2492).